Montana, session 2025, SB509.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Short title. [Sections 1 through 4] may be cited as the "Agricultural
Embedded Software Act".

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 through 4], unless the context clearly
indicates otherwise, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Agricultural equipment" or "equipment" means the mobile equipment consisting of binders,
reapers, tractors, harvesters, harrows, tedders, and other similar equipment and accessories involved in
agricultural processes and that depends for its functioning, in whole or in part, on digital electronics embedded
in or attached to the equipment.
(2) (a) "Authorized repair provider" means an individual or business who has:
(i) an arrangement with the original equipment manufacturer under which the original equipment
manufacturer grants to the individual or business a license to use a tradename, service mark, or other
proprietary identifier for offering the services of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of agricultural equipment
under the name of the original equipment manufacturer; or
(ii) another arrangement with the original equipment manufacturer to offer the services of
diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of agricultural equipment on behalf of or under contract to the original
equipment manufacturer.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 509

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 509.1
(b) An original equipment manufacturer who offers the services of diagnosis, maintenance, or
repair of its own agricultural equipment is considered an authorized repair provider with respect to this
equipment.
(3) "Documentation" means a manual, maintenance procedure, functional or wiring diagram,
reporting output, service code description, circuit board schematic, security code, password, training material,
troubleshooting information, list of required tools, parts list, or other guidance or information used in the
services of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of the agricultural equipment.
(4) "Embedded software" means any programmable software instructions that are delivered with or
loaded into the agricultural equipment or a part of the equipment to allow the equipment or part to operate or
communicate with other computer hardware. The term includes all relevant software updates, patches, and
fixes that the manufacturer makes for purposes of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of the agricultural
equipment.
(5) "Independent repair provider" means an individual or business operating in the state that does
not have an arrangement described in subsection (2) with an original equipment manufacturer and who is
engaged in the services of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of agricultural equipment.
(6) "On fair and reasonable terms" means:
(a) at costs and terms that are equivalent to the most favorable costs and terms an original
equipment manufacturer offers to an authorized repair provider, accounting for:
(i) any discount, rebate, convenient and timely means of delivery, means of enabling fully restored
and updated functionality, rights of use, or other incentive and preference the original manufacturer offers to an
authorized repair provider; or
(ii) any additional cost, burden, or impediment the original equipment manufacturer imposes on an
owner or independent repair provider;
(b) with respect to documentation, made available by the original equipment manufacturer at no
charge, except that, when the documentation is requested in physical printed form, a charge may be included
for the reasonable, actual costs of preparing and sending the copy;
(c) with respect to tools, made available by the original equipment manufacturer:
(i) at no charge, except that, when a tool is requested in physical form, a charge may be included
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 509

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 509.1
for the reasonable, actual costs of preparing and sending the tool;
(ii) without requiring authorization or internet access for the use or operation of these tools and
without imposing impediments to access to or use of the tools to diagnose, maintain, or repair and enable full
functionality of digital electronic equipment; and
(iii) not in a manner that impairs the efficient and cost-effective performance of any diagnosis,
maintenance, or repair; or
(d) with respect to parts, made available by the original equipment manufacturer, either directly or
through an authorized repair provider, in a manner that:
(i) does not condition access to parts on any additional contract, other than a purchase order; and
(ii) if the parts are necessary for the owner or independent repair provider to diagnose, maintain,
or repair agricultural equipment made by or on behalf of the original equipment manufacturer, does not impose
a substantial obligation or restriction through minimum or reasonable maximum purchase requirements.
However, if the parts are not strictly necessary, the original equipment manufacturer may set minimum and
reasonable maximum quantity limits for the purchase of the parts.
(7) "Original equipment manufacturer" or "manufacturer" means a business engaged in the
occupation of selling, leasing, or otherwise supplying new agricultural equipment manufactured by or on behalf
of the business, to any individual or business.
(8) "Part" means any replacement part, either new or used, generally available or used by an
original equipment manufacturer or its authorized repair providers, for the services of maintenance or repair of
agricultural equipment manufactured by or on behalf of, sold, or otherwise supplied by the original equipment
manufacturer.
(9) "Parts pairing" means the practice by manufacturers of using software to identify component
parts through a unique identifier.
(10) "Secure release system" means a system with the purpose of sharing information, including
digital files and text, and is protected against unauthorized access.
(11) "Tool" means any software program, hardware implement, or other apparatus used for
diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of agricultural equipment, including software or other mechanisms that
provision, program, or pair a new part, calibrate functionality, or perform any other function required to bring the
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 509

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 509.1
product back to fully functional condition, including any software updates.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Requirements. (1) All embedded software provided with, or
subsequently updated in, agricultural equipment is considered sold, rather than licensed, under state law.
(2) A manufacturer of agricultural equipment may not require an owner or any subsequent owners
to enter into an agreement that restricts the use of the equipment’s embedded software capabilities, whether as
originally intended or as subsequently updated, for the duration of the equipment’s useful life.
(3) Upon the valid sale or transfer of agricultural equipment to a third party, all rights and privileges
granted to the original owner must transfer to the new owner without requiring approval or notification from the
manufacturer.
(4) Any embedded software necessary for the operation of agricultural equipment, including the
software originally provided and subsequent software updates, must be made freely available by the
manufacturer or an authorized repair provider to the owner or an independent repair provider to ensure the
agricultural equipment’s full functionality.
(5) Manufacturers shall make available to the owner or an independent repair provider all parts,
tools, and documentation necessary to test and install any embedded software that is equivalent to that
provided to an authorized repair provider on fair and reasonable terms.
(6) If a part that houses embedded software fails and requires replacement, the manufacturer shall
provide the necessary parts, tools, and documentation to install the embedded software, including any software
updates, for the new part at no charge.
(7) An original equipment manufacturer may not use parts pairing or any other mechanism to:
(a) prevent the installation or functioning of any otherwise functional part, including a
nonmanufacturer replacement part or component;
(b) inhibit or reduce the functioning of any part or board-level component in a manner that
replacement by an independent repair provider or owner would cause the equipment to operate with reduced
functionality or performance;
(c) create false, misleading, or deceptive alerts or warnings about parts;
(d) charge additional fees or increased prices for future repairs; or
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 509

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 509.1
(e) limit who can purchase documentation, parts, and tools or perform repair services.
(8) (a) For agricultural equipment that requires the deactivation of an electronic lock for diagnosis,
maintenance, or repair purposes, the original equipment manufacturer shall make available, on fair and
reasonable terms, all documentation, tools, and parts necessary to access and reset the lock or function that
was disabled during the diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of the agricultural equipment.
(b) The original equipment manufacturer shall make the documentation, tools, and parts available
to:
(i) the equipment owner; or
(ii) an independent repair provider with the express permission of the equipment owner.
(c) The documentation, tools, and parts may be provided through an appropriate secure release
system to protect against unauthorized access.
(9) A software update may not delete or diminish the functionality of agricultural equipment as
originally intended, except for the purposes of safety and security.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Enforcement -- penalty. A violation of a provision of [sections 1 through
4] is an unfair or deceptive trade practice under Title 30, chapter 14, part 2, and the penalties provided in 30-14-
224(1) apply.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Effective date. [This act] is effective January 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 4] are intended to be
codified as an integral part of Title 30, chapter 11, part 8, and the provisions of Title 30, chapter 11, part 8,
apply to [sections 1 through 4].
- END -
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – SB 509